Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7861.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
The Legislature hereby finds that:
(1) Recent advances in genetic science have led to improvements in the diagnosis,
treatment, and understanding of a significant number of human diseases;
(2) Genetic testing can help individuals take steps to avoid disease entirely or identify
disease earlier, maximizing an individual's health and lifespan and reducing health care costs for
patients, families, and communities in the long term;
(3) Concerns about ability to access insurance create a disincentive from seeking genetic
testing for some individuals, preventing the full realization of opportunity for genetic testing;
(4) The Genetic Information Nondiscrimination Act of 2008, 29 U.S.C. 1182, prohibits
genetic information from being used as a condition of eligibility, to set premium rates, or impose
preexisting condition exclusions for health insurance;
(5) The intent of section 2 of this act is to reduce barriers to the benefits of genetic testing
by protecting genetic information from being used to impact access to life insurance, group
disability insurance, or long-term care insurance coverage.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-4 of the General Laws entitled "Life Insurance Policies and
Reserves" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-4-4.1. Use of genetic testing information prohibited.
(a) In the absence of clinical diagnosis of a condition, or manifestation of a disease, life

insurers, disability insurers, and long-term care insurers shall not:
(1) Cancel, limit, or deny coverage, or establish differentials in premium rates based on
genetic information collected, used, or stored for healthcare treatment; or
(2) Require or solicit genetic information, use genetic test results, or consider an
individual's decision or action relating to genetic testing in any manner or for any purpose related
to life insurance, disability insurance, or long-term care insurance.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “manifestation of a disease” means the outward
signs, symptoms, or physical evidence that a disease is present.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Prevent life insurers, disability insurers, and long-term care insurers from reviewing an
individual's medical record as part of an application;
(2) Prohibit requiring an applicant for insurance coverage to answer questions regarding
family health history; or
(3) Prohibit a life insurer, disability insurer, or long-term care insurer from considering a
clinical diagnosis or manifestation of a disease included in an individual's medical record for
insurance purposes.
(d) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Genetic information" has the same meaning as defined in § 27-18-52.1(c); and
(2) "Genetic test" has the same meaning as defined in section § 27-18-52(c).
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-34.2 of the General Laws entitled "Long-Term Care Insurance"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-34.2-5.1. Use of genetic testing information prohibited.
(a) In the absence of clinical diagnosis of a condition, or manifestation of a disease, life
insurers, disability insurers providing disability income protection coverage, and long-term care
insurers shall not:
(1) Cancel, limit, or deny coverage, or establish differentials in premium rates based on
genetic information collected, used, or stored for healthcare treatment; or
(2) Require or solicit genetic information, use genetic test results, or consider an
individual's decision or action relating to genetic testing in any manner or for any purpose related
to life insurance, disability income protection insurance, or long-term care insurance.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “manifestation of a disease” means the outward
signs, symptoms, or physical evidence that a disease is present.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Prevent life insurers, disability insurers providing disability income protection
LC005703 - Page 2 of 4

coverage, and long-term care insurers from reviewing an individual's medical record as part of an
application;
(2) Prohibit requiring an applicant for insurance coverage to answer questions regarding
family health history; or
(3) Prohibit a life insurer, disability insurer providing disability income protection
coverage, or long-term care insurer from considering a clinical diagnosis or manifestation of a
disease included in an individual's medical record for insurance purposes.
(d) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Disability income protection coverage" means a policy with benefits limited to income
protection or the provision of income when an insured is unable to work due to injury or illness;
(2) "Genetic information" has the same meaning as defined in § 27-18-52.1(c); and
(3) "Genetic test" has the same meaning as defined in section § 27-18-52(c).
SECTION 4. The title of Chapter 27-34.2 of the General Laws entitled "Long-Term Care
Insurance" is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 27-34.2
Long-Term Care Insurance
CHAPTER 27-34.2
LONG-TERM CARE INSURANCE AND DISABILITY INCOME PROTECTION
COVERAGE
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005703
========
LC005703 - Page 3 of 4